Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 35.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-655
Brain injury registry; Department of Health and Human Services; establish and maintain; information released.

The department shall establish and maintain the brain injury registry. The registry shall consist of information concerning persons with brain or head injury that occurs within the state. The registry shall include such information as the department deems necessary and appropriate for the statistical identification of persons with brain or head injury, planning for the treatment and rehabilitation of such persons, and the prevention of such injury. Any information released from the registry shall be disclosed as Class I, Class II, and Class IV data as provided in sections 81-663 to 81-675.

Laws 1992, LB 308, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 120;

Laws 2008, LB928, § 35.
July 18, 2008